lexicon/apertium-krc.Cyrl-Seegmiller.twol
Alphabet 

	а:a б:b в:w г:g д:d е:e ё:ö ж:j з:z и:i й:y к:k л:l м:m н:n о:o п:p р:r с:s т:t у:u ф:f х:h ч:ç ш:ş щ:ş ъ:0 ы:ı ь:0 э:e ю:ü я:a
	А:A Б:B В:V Г:G Д:D Е:E Ё:Ö Ж:j З:Z И:İ Й:Y К:K Л:L М:M Н:N О:O П:P Р:R С:S Т:T У:U Ф:F Х:H Ч:Ç Ш:Ş Щ:Ş Ъ:0 Ы:I Ь:0 Э:Е Ю:Ü Я:A
	a â b c ç d e f g ğ h i ı j k l m n ñ o ö p q r s ş t u ü v w x y z
	A Â B C Ç D E F G Ğ H İ I J K L M N Ñ O Ö P Q R S Ş T U Ú V W X Y Z 
   %{İ%}:İ %{й%}:0 %{☭%}:0
	%{ö%}:ö %{ü%}:ü
	%{c%}:c %{ğ%}:ğ %{q%}:q %{ŋ%}:ŋ
	;


Sets

Cns = б в г д ж з й к л м н п р с т ф х ч ш щ
	   Б В Г Д Ж З Й К Л М Н П Р С Т Ф Х Ч Ш Щ ; 

Vow = е ё я ю а э и о у ы
      Е Ё Я Ю А Э И О У Ы ;

Yot = е ё я ю
      Е Ё Я Ю ;

FrontVow = е э и
           Е Э И ; ! non-first syllable only!

BackVow = а у о ы
          А У О Ы ; ! non-first syllable only!

Unspec = б в д ж з л й м н п р с т ф х ц ч ш щ
         Б В Д Ж З Л й М Н П Р С Т Ф Х Ц Ч Ш Щ ;

Ambig = к г
        К Г ;

FrontAmbig = н л
             Н Л ;

Rules


!"Insert y for yot letters"
!%{й%}:y <=> .#. _ Yot: ;
!            Vow:  _ Yot: ;
!            Cns: [ ь:0 ] _ Yot: ;
!            Ambig: [ ъ:0 ] _ Yot: ;

!! гонъюль:göñül
!@ г:g о:ö н:ñ ъ:0 {й}:0 ю:ü л:l ь:0

!! кенъез:keñez

!! юзюни:yüzüni
!@ {й}:y ю:ü з:z {й}:0 ю:ü н:n и:i

!"я as â after Consonants"
!я:â <=> Cns: [ :0 - [ ь: | ъ: ] ]* _ ;

!-! Ягъя:yağya
!! ягъя:yağya

!! дюньяны:dünyanı
!-@ д:d ю:ü н:n ь:0 {й}:y я:a н:n ы:ı

!! яраткъан:yaratqan
!-@ 0:y я:a р:r а:a т:t к:q ъ:0 а:a н:n

!! къыяфетимизге:qıyafetimizge
!-@ к:q ъ:0 ы:ı 0:y я:a ф:f е:e т:t и:i м:m и:i з:z г:g е:e

!! лянет:lânet
!-@ л:l я:â н:n е:e т:t

!"Make къ and гъ and нъ into q and ğ and ñ"
!Cx:Cy <=> _ ъ:0 ;
!      where Cx in ( к г н К Г Н )
!            Cy in ( q ğ ŋ Q Ğ Ŋ )
!      matched ;

!! ёкъ:yoq
!-@ 0:y ё:o к:q ъ:0

!! ер:yer


!! яхшы:yahşı


!"Back vowels in back vowel contexts"
!Sx:Sy <=> Vow: ( %{й%}: ) _ Unspec:* [ BackVow: | [ Ambig: ъ: ] ] ;
!          .#. ( %{й%}: ) _ Unspec:* [ BackVow: | [ Ambig: ъ: ] | [ Unspec: .#. ] ] ;
!      except
!          BackVow: Unspec:* _ ;
!      where Sx in ( ё ю )
!            Sy in ( o u )
!      matched ;

!! махлюкъларгъа:mahlüqlarğa

!! ёнь:yön

!! учь:üç

!! кунь:kün

!! уджюм:ucüm

!-! долашыюр:dolaşıyur

!-! резолюция:rezolütsiya


!"Front vowels in front vowel contexts"
!Sx:Sy <=> _ [ Unspec: | %{й%}: ]*/[ :0 - ъ: ]* [ FrontVow: | [ Ambig: \ъ: ] | ь: ] ;
!          _ [ Unspec: | %{й%}: ]*/[ :0 - ъ: ]* ю:ü ;
!          Ambig: _ ; ! кок:kök кой:köy
!          _ [ Unspec: ь: ]+ :0* .#. ; ! уй:üy
!      except
!          ъ:0 _ ;
!          _ [ Unspec: ]* %{й%}: ю: [ Unspec: | %{й%}: ]* [ BackVow: | [ Ambig: ъ: ] ] ;
!          _ [ Unspec: | %{й%}: | [ н: ъ: ] ]* [ BackVow: | [ Ambig: ъ: ] ] ;
!          _ [ Unspec: ( ъ: ) ]* .#. ; ! рух:ruh, бу:bu
!     ! lexical exceptions
!          .#. _ н: %{й%}:0 е: н: .#. ;
!          .#. б: _ г: у: н: ь: ;
!          .#. %{й%}: е: _ д: и: й: ;
!          .#. _ д: ж: %{й%}:0 ю: м: ;
!          _ [ : - [ %{☭%}: | ь: ] ]* %{☭%}: ;
!      where Sx in ( о у О У )
!            Sy in ( ö ü Ö Ü )
!      matched ;

!! пунктуация:punktuatsiya
!@ п:p у:u н:n к:k т:t у:u а:a т:t с:s и:i {й}:y я:a {☭}:0

!! бугуньге:bugünge

!! еудийлер:yeudiyler

!! сёзюни:sözüni

!! союндан:soyundan

!! Исраильге:İsrailge

!! онен:onen
!@ о:o н:n {й}:0 е:e н:n

!! сонъ:soñ

!! олсун:olsun
!@ о:o л:l с:s у:u н:n

!! бу:bu
!@ б:b у:u

!! боюнджа:boyunca
!@ б:b о:o {й}:y ю:u н:n д:0 ж:c а:a 

!! буюк:büyük
!@ б:b у:ü {й}:y ю:ü к:k 

!! бутюн:bütün
!@ б:b у:ü т:t {й}:0 ю:ü н:n

!! кок:kök

!-! Озюнинъ:Özüniñ

!! экинджи:ekinci

!"дж to c — ж:c"
!ж:c <=> д: _ ;

!"дж to c — д:0"
!д:0 <=> _ ж: ;

!! озь:öz

!! озю:özü

!! урьмет:ürmet

!! омюр:ömür

!! козю:közü

!! косьтерген:köstergen

!! ольдюрильди:öldürildi
!! ольдюрильген:öldürilgen


!! озюнъни:özüñni

!! озю:özü

!! къуюны:quyunı
!-@ к:q ъ:0 у:u 0:y ю:u н:n ы:ı

!! корьдим:kördim

!! къоркъкъан:qorqqan

!! куню:künü

!! Ибрамгъа:İbramğa

!! мумкюн:mümkün

!! къоюлгъан:qoyulğan

!! коюне:köyüne

!! мушкюль:müşkül

!! юзь:yüz

!! огълан:oğlan
!@ о:o г:ğ ъ:0 л:l а:a н:n

!! онъа:oña
!@ о:o н:ñ ъ:0 а:a

!! огълуна:oğluna
!@ о:o г:ğ ъ:0 л:l у:u н:n а:a

!! бугунь:bugün

!! ёл:yol
!@ {й}:y ё:o л:l

!! гъурбетликте:ğurbetlikte

!! къасеветини:qasevetini

!! эвлятларынъ:evlâtlarıñ

!! лякин:lâkin

!! рух:ruh
!@ р:r у:u х:h

!! уй:üy
!@ у:ü й:y

!! кой:köy
!@ к:k о:ö й:y

"dummy rule"
а:0 <=> а: а: _ б: б: ;
